District of Columbia statutes.
1-615.53

Prohibitions.

(a)

A supervisor shall not take, or threaten to take, a prohibited personnel action or otherwise retaliate against an employee because of the employee’s protected disclosure or because of an employee’s refusal to comply with an illegal order.

(b)

Except in cases where the communication would be unlawful, a person shall not interfere with or deny the right of employees, individually or collectively, to furnish information to the Council, a Council committee, or a Councilmember.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1553
as added Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(c), 45 DCR 5147
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-117, § 2(b), 57 DCR 896

History

This section is referenced in § 1-615.54 and § 1-615.55.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-616.13.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 18-117 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “A supervisor shall not threaten to take or take a prohibited personnel action or otherwise retaliate against an employee because of the employee’s protected disclosure or because of an employee’s refusal to comply with an illegal order.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-615.51.

Emergency Legislation